Washington statutes.
RCW 18.22.120

License renewal.

The board shall establish by rule the requirements for renewal of licenses and relicensing. Administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees shall be established as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

[ 1996 c 191 s 7; 1990 c 147 s 13; 1985 c 7 s 13; 1982 c 21 s 14; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 18; 1973 c 77 s 10; 1971 ex.s. c 266 s 4; 1965 c 97 s 2; 1955 c 149 s 6. Prior: (i) 1921 c 120 s 5, part; 1917 c 38 s 9, part; RRS s 10082, part. (ii) 1921 c 120 s 9; RRS s 10096.]